Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201654-753
Prevention of
disease; writ of injunction available.

The penal
provisions of section 54-752 shall not be exclusive, but the district courts
of this state, in the exercise of their equity jurisdiction, may, by injunction,
compel the observance of, and by that remedy enforce, the provisions of the Exotic Animal Auction or Exchange
Venue Act and sections 54-701 to 54-753 and the rules and regulations
established and promulgated by the Department of Agriculture.

Laws 1927, c. 12, art. VIII, § 14, p. 95;

C.S.1929, § 54-951;

R.S.1943, § 54-753;

Laws 2001, LB 438, § 19;

Laws 2006, LB 856, § 24;

Laws 2014, LB884, § 12.

Exotic Animal Auction or Exchange Venue Act, see section 54-7,105.